Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.050

Collateral for deposits—Segregation—Eligible securities.

(1) Every public depositary shall complete a depositary pledge agreement with the commission and a trustee, and shall at all times maintain, segregated from its other assets, eligible collateral having a value at least equal to its maximum liability and as otherwise prescribed in this chapter. Eligible securities used as collateral shall be segregated by deposit with the depositary's trustee and shall be clearly designated as security for the benefit of public depositors under this chapter.

(2) Securities eligible as collateral shall be valued at market value, and the total market value of securities pledged in accordance with this chapter shall not be reduced by withdrawal or substitution of securities except by prior authorization, in writing, by the commission.

(3) The public depositary shall have the right to make substitutions of an equal or greater amount of eligible securities at any time.

(4) The income from the securities which have been segregated as collateral shall belong to the public depositary without restriction.

(5) Each of the following enumerated classes of securities, providing there has been no default in the payment of principal or interest thereon, shall be eligible to qualify as collateral:

(a) Certificates, notes or bonds of the United States, or other obligations of the United States or its agencies, or of any corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States;

(b) State, county, municipal, or school district bonds or warrants of taxing districts of the state of Washington or any other state of the United States, provided that such bonds and warrants shall be only those found to be within the limit of indebtedness prescribed by law for the taxing district issuing them and to be general obligations;

(c) The obligations of any United States government-sponsored corporation whose obligations are or may become eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the board of governors of the federal reserve system;

(d) Bonds, notes, or other securities or evidence of indebtedness constituting the direct and general obligation of a federal home loan bank or federal reserve bank;

(e) Revenue bonds of this state or any authority, board, commission, committee, or similar agency thereof, and any municipality or taxing district of this state;

(f) Direct and general obligation bonds and warrants of any city, town, county, school district, port district, or other political subdivision of any state, having the power to levy general taxes, which are payable from general ad valorem taxes;

(g) Bonds issued by public utility districts as authorized under the provisions of Title 54 RCW, as now or hereafter amended;

(h) Bonds of any city of the state of Washington for the payment of which the entire revenues of the city's water system, power and light system, or both, less maintenance and operating costs, are irrevocably pledged, even though such bonds are not general obligations of such city.

(6) In addition to the securities enumerated in this section, the commission may also accept as collateral a letter of credit from a federal home loan bank or a federal reserve bank on behalf of a public depositary, naming the commission as beneficiary. Such letters are not subject to a completed depositary pledge agreement. As such, the commission must act as the safekeeping agent for letters of credit.

(7) A public depositary may also segregate such bonds, securities, and other obligations as are designated to be authorized security for public deposits under the laws of this state.

(8) The commission may determine by rule or resolution whether any security, whether or not enumerated in this section, is or shall remain eligible as collateral when in the commission's judgment it is desirable or necessary to do so.

[ 2016 c 152 s 2; 2009 c 9 s 4; 1996 c 256 s 4; 1989 c 97 s 4; 1984 c 177 s 13; 1983 c 66 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 77 s 3; 1973 c 126 s 11; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.